Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-534
Streets; grading; estimate of cost; contract for.

Before any street, avenue, alley or thoroughfare is graded, the city engineer shall make a careful and detailed estimate of the total cost of such grading, and shall report the same to the council as an approximate estimate of such cost. If such estimate is approved by the council, thereupon a contract may be let for the grading in the manner provided for letting improvement contracts, which contract, however, shall not exceed in total amount the approved approximate estimate.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 24, p. 481;

C.S.1922, § 3650;

C.S.1929, § 14-527;

R.S.1943, § 14-534.